North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 2. Conversion to Domestic Partnership.

§ 59-73.10.
Conversion.

A business entity other than a domestic partnership may convert to a domestic partnership if:

The conversion is permitted by the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity; and

The converting business entity complies with the requirements of this Part and, to the extent applicable, the laws referred to in subdivision (1) of this section.

History.

2001-387, s. 108.

§ 59-73.11.
Plan of conversion.

The converting business entity shall approve a written plan of conversion containing:

The name of the converting business entity, its type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs;

The name of the resulting domestic partnership into which the converting business entity shall convert;

The terms and conditions of the conversion; and

The manner and basis for converting the interests in the converting business entity into interests, obligations, or securities of the resulting domestic partnership or into cash or other property in whole or in part.

(a1)

The plan of conversion may contain other provisions relating to the conversion.

(a2)

The provisions of the plan of conversion, other than the provisions required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan of conversion if the plan of conversion sets forth the manner in which the facts will operate upon the affected provisions. The facts may include any of the following:

(1)

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

(2)

A determination or action by the converting business entity or by any other person, group.

(3)

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the converting business entity is a party, or any other agreement or document.

The plan of conversion shall be approved in accordance with the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity.

After a plan of conversion has been approved as provided in subsection (b) of this section but before the articles of conversion become effective, the plan of conversion may be amended or abandoned to the extent permitted by the laws that govern the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity.

History.

2001-387, s. 108; 2001-487, s. 62(r); 2005-268, s. 52.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-268, s. 52, effective October 1, 2005, redesignated the former last paragraph of subsection (a) as subsection (a1) and added subsection (a2).

§ 59-73.12.
Filing of articles of conversion by converting business entity.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting business entity as provided in

G.S. 59-73.11

, the converting business entity shall deliver articles of conversion to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of conversion shall state:

That the domestic partnership is being formed pursuant to a conversion of another business entity;

The name of the resulting domestic partnership, a designation of its mailing address, and a commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address;

The name of the converting business entity, its type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs; and

That a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting business entity as required by law.If the resulting domestic partnership is to be a registered limited liability partnership when the conversion takes effect, then instead of the converting business entity delivering the articles of conversion to the Secretary of State for filing, the articles of conversion shall be included as part of the application for registration filed pursuant to

G.S. 59-84.2

in addition to the matters otherwise required or permitted by law.If the plan of conversion is abandoned after the articles of conversion have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the articles of conversion become effective, an amendment to the articles of conversion withdrawing the articles of conversion shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the time the articles of conversion become effective.

The conversion takes effect when the articles of conversion become effective.

Certificates of conversion shall also be registered as provided in

G.S. 47-18.1

.

History.

2001-387, s. 108; 2001-487, s. 62(s); 2002-159, s. 34(a).

§ 59-73.13.
Effects of conversion.

When the conversion takes effect:

The converting business entity ceases its prior form of organization and continues in existence as the resulting domestic partnership;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting business entity continues vested in the resulting domestic partnership without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of the converting business entity continue as liabilities of the resulting domestic partnership;

A proceeding pending by or against the converting business entity may be continued as if the conversion did not occur; and

The interests in the converting business entity that are to be converted into interests, obligations, or securities of the resulting domestic partnership or into the right to receive cash or other property are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of interests in the converting business entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of conversion.The conversion shall not affect the liability or absence of liability of any holder of an interest in the converting business entity for any acts, omissions, or obligations of the converting business entity made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the conversion. The cessation of the existence of the converting business entity in its prior form of organization in the conversion shall not constitute a dissolution or termination of the converting business entity.

When the conversion takes effect, the resulting domestic partnership is deemed:

To agree that it may be served with process in this State for enforcement of (i) any obligation of the converting business entity and (ii) any obligation of the resulting domestic partnership arising from the conversion; and

To have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any such proceeding. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by

G.S. 59-35.2

. Upon receipt of service of process on behalf of a resulting domestic partnership in the manner provided for in this section, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the resulting domestic partnership. If the resulting domestic partnership is a registered limited liability partnership, the address for mailing shall be its principal office or, if there is no principal office on file, its registered office. If the resulting domestic partnership is not a registered limited liability partnership, the address for mailing shall be the mailing address designated pursuant to G.S. 59-73.12(a)(2).

History.

2001-387, s. 108; 2001-387, s. 170(c).

§§ 59-73.14 through 59-73.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.